Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-2201
Large Load Customer Regulation Act, how cited.

Sections 70-2201 to 70-2204 shall be known and may be cited as the Large Load Customer Regulation Act.

Laws 2026, LB1010, § 1.
July 18, 2026